uz.aff
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlarnimikan . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlarniku . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlargami . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlargadir . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlargada . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlargadirda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlargamikan . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlargaku . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlardanmi . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlardandir . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlardanda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlardandirda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlardanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlardanku . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlardami . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlardadir . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlardada . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlardadirda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlardamikan . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmaganlardaku . 
SFX Z 0 ganimni . 
SFX Z 0 ganimnimi . 
SFX Z 0 ganimnidir . 
SFX Z 0 ganimnida . 
SFX Z 0 ganimnidirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganimnimikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganimniku . 
SFX Z 0 ganimning . 
SFX Z 0 ganimningmi . 
SFX Z 0 ganimningdir . 
SFX Z 0 ganimningda . 
SFX Z 0 ganimningdirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganimningmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganimningku . 
SFX Z 0 ganimga . 
SFX Z 0 ganimgami . 
SFX Z 0 ganimgadir . 
SFX Z 0 ganimgada . 
SFX Z 0 ganimgadirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganimgamikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganimgaku . 
SFX Z 0 ganimdan . 
SFX Z 0 ganimdanmi . 
SFX Z 0 ganimdandir . 
SFX Z 0 ganimdanda . 
SFX Z 0 ganimdandirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganimdanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganimdanku . 
SFX Z 0 ganimda . 
SFX Z 0 ganimdami . 
SFX Z 0 ganimdadir . 
SFX Z 0 ganimdada . 
SFX Z 0 ganimdadirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganimdamikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganimdaku . 
SFX Z 0 ganini . 
SFX Z 0 ganinimi . 
SFX Z 0 ganinidir . 
SFX Z 0 ganinida . 
SFX Z 0 ganinidirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganinimikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganiniku . 
SFX Z 0 ganining . 
SFX Z 0 ganiningmi . 
SFX Z 0 ganiningdir . 
SFX Z 0 ganiningda . 
SFX Z 0 ganiningdirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganiningmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganiningku . 
SFX Z 0 ganiga . 
SFX Z 0 ganigami . 
SFX Z 0 ganigadir . 
SFX Z 0 ganigada . 
SFX Z 0 ganigadirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganigamikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganigaku . 
SFX Z 0 ganidan . 
SFX Z 0 ganidanmi . 
SFX Z 0 ganidandir . 
SFX Z 0 ganidanda . 
SFX Z 0 ganidandirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganidanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganidanku . 
SFX Z 0 ganida . 
SFX Z 0 ganidami . 
SFX Z 0 ganidadir . 
SFX Z 0 ganidada . 
SFX Z 0 ganidadirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganidamikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganidaku . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizni . 
SFX Z 0 ganimiznimi . 
SFX Z 0 ganimiznidir . 
SFX Z 0 ganimiznida . 
SFX Z 0 ganimiznidirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganimiznimikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizniku . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizning . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizningmi . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizningdir . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizningda . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizningdirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizningmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizningku . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizga . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizgami . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizgadir . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizgada . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizgadirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizgamikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizgaku . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizdan . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizdanmi . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizdandir . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizdanda . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizdandirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizdanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizdanku . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizda . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizdami . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizdadir . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizdada . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizdadirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizdamikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganimizdaku . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizni . 
SFX Z 0 ganingiznimi . 
SFX Z 0 ganingiznidir . 
SFX Z 0 ganingiznida . 
SFX Z 0 ganingiznidirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganingiznimikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizniku . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizning . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizningmi . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizningdir . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizningda . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizningdirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizningmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizningku . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizga . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizgami . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizgadir . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizgada . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizgadirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizgamikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizgaku . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizdan . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizdanmi . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizdandir . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizdanda . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizdandirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizdanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizdanku . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizda . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizdami . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizdadir . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizdada . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizdadirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizdamikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganingizdaku . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimni . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimnimi . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimnidir . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimnida . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimnidirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimnimikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimniku . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimning . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimningmi . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimningdir . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimningda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimningdirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimningmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimningku . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimga . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimgami . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimgadir . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimgada . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimgadirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimgamikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimgaku . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimdan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimdanmi . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimdandir . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimdanda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimdandirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimdanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimdanku . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimdami . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimdadir . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimdada . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimdadirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimdamikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimdaku . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarini . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarinimi . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarinidir . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarinida . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarinidirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarinimikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlariniku . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarining . 
SFX Z 0 ganlariningmi . 
SFX Z 0 ganlariningdir . 
SFX Z 0 ganlariningda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlariningdirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlariningmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlariningku . 
SFX Z 0 ganlariga . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarigami . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarigadir . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarigada . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarigadirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarigamikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarigaku . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaridan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaridanmi . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaridandir . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaridanda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaridandirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaridanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaridanku . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarida . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaridami . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaridadir . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaridada . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaridadirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaridamikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaridaku . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizni . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimiznimi . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimiznidir . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimiznida . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimiznidirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimiznimikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizniku . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizning . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizningmi . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizningdir . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizningda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizningdirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizningmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizningku . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizga . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizgami . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizgadir . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizgada . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizgadirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizgamikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizgaku . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizdan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizdanmi . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizdandir . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizdanda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizdandirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizdanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizdanku . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizdami . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizdadir . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizdada . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizdadirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizdamikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlarimizdaku . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizni . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringiznimi . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringiznidir . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringiznida . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringiznidirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringiznimikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizniku . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizning . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizningmi . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizningdir . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizningda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizningdirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizningmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizningku . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizga . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizgami . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizgadir . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizgada . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizgadirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizgamikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizgaku . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizdan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizdanmi . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizdandir . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizdanda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizdandirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizdanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizdanku . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizdami . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizdadir . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizdada . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizdadirda . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizdamikan . 
SFX Z 0 ganlaringizdaku . 
SFX Z 0 maganimni . 
SFX Z 0 maganimnimi . 
SFX Z 0 maganimnidir . 
SFX Z 0 maganimnida . 
SFX Z 0 maganimnidirda . 
SFX Z 0 maganimnimikan . 
SFX Z 0 maganimniku . 
SFX Z 0 maganimning . 
SFX Z 0 maganimningmi . 
SFX Z 0 maganimningdir . 
SFX Z 0 maganimningda . 
SFX Z 0 maganimningdirda . 
SFX Z 0 maganimningmikan . 
SFX Z 0 maganimningku . 
SFX Z 0 maganimga . 
SFX Z 0 maganimgami . 
SFX Z 0 maganimgadir . 
SFX Z 0 maganimgada . 
