uz.dic
abzalla/Z
avarchala/Z
ajra/Z
ayriboshla/Z
alaxsi/Z
alji/Z
angangla/Z
aniqla/Z
arzi/Z
asbestla/Z
atala/Z
axtala/Z
badirla/Z
bandla/Z
bartarafla/Z
begonasira/Z
bezovtala/Z
belchala/Z
big’illa/Z
biji/Z
biqsi/Z
bilchira/Z
bog’la/Z
bolala/Z
boshqala/Z
bo’g’izla/Z
buzoqla/Z
bo’lakla/Z
bo’nakla/Z
burg’ula/Z
bo’rsilla/Z
bo’ta/Z
bo’shanqira/Z
vadilla/Z
vaigvangla/Z
valaqla/Z
varaqla/Z
vartilla/Z
vengerchala/Z
vijirla/Z
visvisla/Z
vishirla/Z
vorilla/Z
gaykala/Z
gardishla/Z
gizilla/Z
gruppala/Z
gumbazla/Z
g’o’rakla/Z
gusurla/Z
dakangla/Z
darakla/Z
deyilmo/Z
dikangla/Z
dirilla/Z
dog’la/Z
duvilla/Z
dukilla/Z
dumaloqla/Z
do’ppasla/Z
yovg’onsira/Z
yoyla/Z
yelinla/Z
yomonla/Z
yori/Z
yotoqchila/Z
jazilla/Z
jarohatla/Z
jikilla/Z
jimirla/Z
jirtilla/Z
juvurla/Z
jo’shla/Z
zapravkala/Z
ziynatla/Z
zirqilla/Z
zori/Z
zumla/Z
izg’i/Z
yig’lamsi/Z
iirikla/Z
ildizla/Z
imirsira/Z
inglizchala/Z
irg’i/Z
isitmala/Z
ispanchala/Z
yo’rgakla/Z
ihotala/Z
ishla/Z
kakilla/Z
kaltakla/Z
karsnlla/Z
kafanla/Z
kepchikla/Z
kilkilla/Z
kisnrla/Z
kishtla/Z
koviyala/Z
komposterla/Z
korsilla/Z
ko’zala/Z
kuyla/Z
ko’lmakla/Z
kumushla/Z
ko’pchi/Z
kurmakla/Z
ko’targia/Z
kuchla/Z
qavarinqira/Z
qag’qag’la/Z
qayna/Z
qaqilla/Z
qala/Z
qaltira/Z
qanqilla/Z
qarg’a/Z
qarilla/Z
qasmoqla/Z
qatla/Z
qattiqla/Z
qig’illa/Z
qiyilla/Z
qiyna/Z
qiqilla/Z
qiltangla/Z
qimti/Z
qirovla/Z
qirchilla/Z
qisinqira/Z
qitiqla/Z
qishla/Z
qovjira/Z
ququqla/Z
qo’lla/Z
qo’msa/Z
qurg’a/Z
qo’rqimsira/Z
qurtla/Z
qursha/Z
qo’shaloqla/Z
layhonla/Z
larzangla/Z
liqangla/Z
liqilla/Z
lirqilla/Z
lovilla/Z
loyla/Z
loshnala/Z
mag’orla/Z
mazammatla/Z
mahkamla/Z
mengrovsi/Z
metrla/Z
miji/Z
milmilla/Z
misvoqla/Z
movla/Z
montajla/Z
muzla/Z
mo’lla/Z
munkilla/Z
mo’rala/Z
mo’shtla/Z
naychala/Z
naminqira/Z
nasosla/Z
na’lla/Z
nizomla/Z
niqta/Z
nishtarla/Z
noli/Z
nuqtala/Z
obzorla/Z
ovla/Z
odimla/Z
oqsa/Z
olchinla/Z
orzula/Z
otqila/Z
ohola/Z
ochinqira/Z
paqilla/Z
pallala/Z
panshaxala/Z
pardozla/Z
partilla/Z
patirla/Z
piypala/Z
pildira/Z
pirpira/Z
pishangla/Z
plazmo/Z
poyla/Z
polyarizatsiyala/Z
popukyaa/Z
port-portla/Z
po’kakla/Z
po’kpo’kla/Z
purka/Z
puxtala/Z
randala/Z
redla/Z
remontla/Z
rulonla/Z
savala/Z
saqla/Z
salqinla/Z
sandira/Z
saranjomla/Z
sarjinla/Z
sachra/Z
selpi/Z
sepla/Z
sizg’i/Z
siypala/Z
siqimla/Z
sintezla/Z
sirqi/Z
sirtmoqla/Z
sovunla/Z
solqi/Z
sofla/Z
suva/Z
sug’urtala/Z
so’dra/Z
so’li/Z
so’mla/Z
surg’uchla/Z
so’tala/Z
suya/Z
tayoqla/Z
takmilla/Z
takfinla/Z
taqdirla/Z
taqirla/Z
talmovsira/Z
tamg’ala/Z
tang’illa/Z
tanobla/Z
tara/Z
tarvayla/Z
tasmala/Z
tatarchala/Z
taftishla/Z
taxtala/Z
tashqnla/Z
ta’zimla/Z
tejab-terga/Z
tezla/Z
tentira/Z
termala/Z
teshala/Z
tizzala/Z
tiqirla/Z
tilimla/Z
timtala/Z
tinib-tinchi/Z
tipirla/Z
tira/Z
tirqira/Z
tirnoqla/Z
titrab-qaqsha/Z
tishla/Z
tovonla/Z
toyla/Z
topta/Z
tortinqira/Z
to’garakla/Z
to’g’rila/Z
tuza/Z
tuzsira/Z
to’qla/Z
to’la/Z
tumovla/Z
to’ngla/Z
tupla/Z
turkchala/Z
turmuchla/Z
tusa/Z
tutilinqira/Z
tuxumla/Z
tushovla/Z
o’gayla/Z
o’dag’ayla/Z
uzib-yulki/Z
o’yla/Z
ukamla/Z
o’kra/Z
o’qta/Z
uli/Z
o’ngi/Z
o’rala/Z
o’rmakla/Z
o’rna/Z
uskunala/Z
o’smoqchi/Z
o’tinqira/Z
uxla/Z
o’ho’hla/Z
uchqunla/Z
usha/Z
uyalinqira/Z
fahmla/Z
foshla/Z
xarakterla/Z
xaritala/Z
xivichla/Z
xirala/Z
xitoychala/Z
xishtakla/Z
xomakila/Z
xomsi/Z
xoxla/Z
xulosala/Z
xo’rakla/Z
xo’txo’tla/Z
sementla/Z
chag’irla/Z
chakilla/Z
chaqirla/Z
chalg’i/Z
chambarakla/Z
chandi/Z
chanoqla/Z
charaqla/Z
charsilla/Z
chatna/Z
chekankala/Z
chena/Z
chiviqla/Z
chizg’ichla/Z
chiyqilla/Z
chiyra/Z
chikchikla/Z
chilpi/Z
chimilla/Z
chinggilla/Z
chiporla/Z
chiri/Z
chirpilla/Z
chitirla/Z
chichangla/Z
choqla/Z
chuva/Z
chuvulla/Z
cho’zg’ila/Z
cho’qila/Z
chuqurla/Z
cho’michla/Z
churulla/Z
cho’tla/Z
cho’chinqira/Z
shag’irla/Z
shaqilla/Z
shaloyala/Z
shanqilla/Z
shapilla/Z
shatirla/Z
shivilla/Z
shig’a/Z
shiypangla/Z
shildira/Z
shilpilla/Z
shing’illa/Z
shipshi/Z
shifola/Z
shnurla/Z
shovqinla/Z
shudgorla/Z
eganala/Z
eyrab-yashna/Z
elab-yulqa/Z
elektrifikatsiyala/Z
elma/Z
emab-yulqi/Z
eminqira/Z
erkala/Z
ersira/Z
eta/Z
yumaloqla/Z
yangra/Z
yarala/Z
yassila/Z
yaxshila/Z
